Arkansas, session 2025, HB1531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 64, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-64-105. Pharmaceutical manufacturer limited distribution of
medication — Legislative findings — Definitions.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is beneficial to this state to support patient access to
prescription drugs and pharmacy services in a market that ensures that
patients can access safe and effective prescription medications with same day
access, as well as patient freedom of choice to utilize local trusted
medication experts and state-based local pharmacists who support patients
with advice and guidance for safe and effective use of these medications;
(2) It may cause harm to patients in this state when local
pharmacies, clinics, and hospitals are unable to access prescription
*JMB394*
04-07-2025 13:25:28 JMB394

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H3/31/25 S4/7/25 HB1531
medications from pharmaceutical manufacturers or pharmaceutical wholesalers
due to out-of-state limited distribution to pharmacies utilizing:
(A) Pharmacy benefits manager-affiliated mail order
pharmacies;
(B) Publicly traded corporation pharmacies;
(C) Pharmaceutical manufacturer-affiliated mail order
pharmacies;
(D) Insurance company-affiliated mail order pharmacies; or
(E) Pharmaceutical wholesaler-affiliated mail order
pharmacies;
(3) The reasons for the limited distribution networks by
pharmaceutical manufacturers are not often disclosed or may not operate with
optimal patient safety and same day patient access in mind;
(4) The supply chain that brings prescription medications from
the pharmaceutical manufacturer to the pharmacy is often complex and lacks
transparency; and
(5) Having more transparency and oversight concerning limited
distribution medications would:
(A) Protect patients with better and more stable
prescription drug inventory for both immediate and long-term patient care
needs; and
(B) Better respond to future national security threats and
natural disasters in this state.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Pharmaceutical manufacturer” means a business or entity
that makes, processes, or packages prescription drugs, over-the-counter
medications, or medical devices to sell in pharmacies or other healthcare
facilities, including any activities that manipulate, test, or control the
product or process;
(2) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid" means an entity
or business that is engaged in manufacturing, preparing, propagating,
compounding, processing, packaging, repackaging, or labeling of a
prescription drug that is eligible in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program or
agrees to participate in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program to pay a rebate to
states for prescription drugs covered by the Arkansas Medicaid Program; and
(3) "State government and public plan sponsor" means an employer
04-07-2025 13:25:28 JMB394

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H3/31/25 S4/7/25 HB1531
sponsor of a health benefit plan for employees that is established or
maintained by:
(A) The Arkansas Municipal League;
(B) A public two-year or four-year institution of higher
education, including a community college or technical college;
(C) The Division of Arkansas State Police;
(D) A municipality;
(E) A county; or
(F) Any other plan or program that is funded by a state
appropriation to furnish, cover the cost of, or otherwise provide for
pharmacist services to an individual who resides in or is employed in this
state.
(c)(1) A pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer
for Medicaid that expects for their prescription medications to be eligible,
considered for payment, and covered in a state government and public plan
sponsor for health benefit plans:
(A) Shall have an active wholesale distributor permit active and
in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy under § 20-64-505;
and
(B) Shall not restrict or limit prescription medications more
than three (3) months after a launch of a new product to a limited
distribution network of pharmacies without having similar access and allowing
for upon request or application by pharmacy at least:
(i) A local network of public institution academic medical
center access;
(ii) Geographic diversity of access within the state;
(iii) Diverse access for local for-profit and nonprofit
pharmacies in good standing with the board and that have experience or
accreditation in managing expensive specialty or limited distribution
medications; and
(iv) The pharmacy meeting medication specific United
States Food and Drug Administration guidance or requirements for:
(a) Proper and safe storage, handling,
monitoring, and drug delivery;
(b) Patient or medication data collection,
monitoring, or reporting; and
04-07-2025 13:25:28 JMB394

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H3/31/25 S4/7/25 HB1531
(c) Patient management services.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section does not apply to the
State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.
(d)(1)(A) A pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical
manufacturer for Medicaid that requests for restricted networks for six (6)
months or longer shall present the request to the board to explain how the
restriction will support and not hinder the mission of the board to promote,
preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare of citizens of
this state.
(B) The request under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this
section shall not be effective until the request is approved by the board.
(2)(A) When considering the request under subdivision (d)(1)(A)
of this section, the board may consider the following factors for a request
of a limited network:
(i) Costs;
(ii) Logistics;
(iii) Patient caseload;
(iv) The rarity of the prescription drug that is
used;
(v) The rarity of the disease or condition; and
(vi) Any other factors unique or relevant to the
medication and disease or condition treated.
(B) The limited network shall allow some pharmacies in
this state, upon request or application, to participate and access the
medications to meet the needs of patients with same day access in this state
without requiring patients to use out-of-state or in-state common mail
carriers for access.
(3) The board may issue a temporary waiver or temporary limited
use allowance for utilization, payment, or coverage of prescription drugs
from a pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer for
Medicaid for coverage and payment for a state government and public plan
sponsor for a health benefit plan to protect public health and access.
(4) A public hearing of the board shall be called as soon as
possible to discuss and approve or deny any request for a permanent limited
network or restriction relating to state-based Class A pharmacies with retail
permits in good standing with the board.
04-07-2025 13:25:28 JMB394

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 H3/31/25 S4/7/25 HB1531
(e) A state government and public plan sponsor for a health benefit
plan shall not pay for prescription drugs from a pharmaceutical manufacturer
or a pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid who is noncompliant with this
section unless the board has granted a temporary waiver or temporary
allowance to protect public health and access.
(f) If a pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer
for Medicaid is not in compliance with this section, the board shall fine the
pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per day of noncompliance.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Compliance date.
A pharmaceutical manufacturer or a pharmaceutical manufacturer for
Medicaid shall be in compliance with this act on or before September 1, 2026.

/s/Achor














04-07-2025 13:25:28 JMB394